Nebraska, session 109, LB1156.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1156 LB1156
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 9 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Disinvested Community Development Incentive Tax Credit Act.
Sec. 2. (1) The Legislature finds and declares that (a) many
communities across the State of Nebraska, including urban neighborhoods,
rural downtowns, and historically disinvested areas, experience
persistent underinvestment in neighborhood-scale commercial, mixed-use,
industrial, and community-serving development, (b) small and emerging
developers and locally based developers face structural barriers to
accessing private capital due to limited balance sheets, limited
development history, and lack of early-stage financing, and (c) existing
economic development incentives frequently favor large-scale projects and
established developers and do not adequately address predevelopment,
workforce development, and community engagement needs.
(2) The Legislature further finds that (a) tax credits are an
effective mechanism to mobilize private capital at scale, encourage
sustained private participation in economic development, and reduce
reliance on direct public appropriations and (b) limited and targeted
grant assistance remains necessary to address market gaps where private
capital is unavailable or insufficient.
(3) It is the intent of the Legislature to establish a tax-credit-
driven urban development incentive program, supplemented by limited grant
assistance, to incentivize private investment in economically distressed
areas, support small and emerging developers and underrepresented
businesses, expand access to affordable commercial or mixed-use space,
promote local job creation and workforce development, encourage
sustainability and resilience, and maximize public benefit while
maintaining predictable fiscal exposure.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Disinvested Community Development
Incentive Tax Credit Act:
(1) Affordable commercial or mixed-use space means commercial or
mixed-use space that is leased or otherwise made available at rates at
-2-

LB1156 LB1156
2026 2026
least thirty percent below prevailing market rates or designated by the
department as serving small businesses, nonprofit organizations, or
community-based enterprises;
(2) Department means the Department of Economic Development;
(3) Economically distressed area means (a) a qualified census tract
as defined in 26 U.S.C. 42(d)(5)(B)(ii)(I), as such section existed on
January 1, 2026, or (b) an area in the State of Nebraska in which the
average unemployment rate is at least one hundred fifty percent of the
statewide average and the poverty rate is at least twenty percent;
(4) Eligible developer means a small developer or emerging developer
that is engaged in the development or rehabilitation of real property,
that has fewer than fifty full-time-equivalent employees, that had annual
gross revenue not exceeding five million dollars in any of the three most
recently completed fiscal years, that is independently owned and operated
and not a subsidiary of a larger business entity, and that has limited
access to traditional financing due to size, operational history, or
limited prior project experience;
(5) Qualified project means the development, redevelopment, or
rehabilitation of affordable commercial or mixed-use space, industrial
facilities, or community-serving facilities located in an economically
distressed area, as approved by the department; and
(6) Qualifying organization means an organization certified by the
department to receive tax-credit-supported contributions, including (a) a
community development financial institution certified by the United
States Department of the Treasury or (b) an innovation hub designated
under the Nebraska Innovation Hub Act.
Sec. 4. (1) A taxpayer who makes a cash contribution to a
qualifying organization for the purpose of funding one or more qualified
projects or eligible activities under the Disinvested Community
Development Incentive Tax Credit Act shall be allowed a nonrefundable
income tax credit equal to fifty percent of the contribution. The credit
-3-

LB1156 LB1156
2026 2026
may be applied against income tax liability imposed under the Nebraska
Revenue Act of 1967. Any unused credit may be carried forward and applied
against tax liability for up to five taxable years.
(2) The total amount of tax credits allowed under this section shall
not exceed twenty-six million five hundred thousand dollars per calendar
year. Credits shall be reserved and allocated by the department on a
first-come, first-served basis subject to availability and compliance
with the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department.
Sec. 5. Tax-credit-supported contributions may be used by
qualifying organizations, subject to approval by the department, for the
following eligible activities:
(1) Development or rehabilitation of affordable commercial or mixed-
use space, including neighborhood-scale retail, office, light industrial,
cultural, nonprofit, and community-serving facilities;
(2) Site readiness and site preparation activities, including
environmental remediation, demolition, utility installation, grading, and
related infrastructure improvements;
(3) Gap financing, credit enhancement, or other financial support
necessary to complete qualified projects;
(4) Development, expansion, or modernization of industrial,
manufacturing, logistics, and intermodal facilities, including supporting
infrastructure;
(5) Creation, expansion, or operation of accelerator programs,
incubators, and innovation programs for early-stage companies;
(6) Provision of business support services and access-to-capital
programming for underrepresented companies;
(7) Workforce development, job training, apprenticeships,
credentialing, and placement programs tied to supported projects or
businesses;
(8) Sustainability, resilience, energy efficiency, renewable energy
systems, and green building certification;
-4-

LB1156 LB1156
2026 2026
(9) Community engagement, public consultation, and capacity-building
activities for eligible developers; and
(10) Sports, cultural, and placemaking facilities located in
economically distressed areas when sponsored by or developed in
partnership with a designated innovation hub.
Sec. 6. (1) The department may award limited grants to eligible
developers for qualified projects when such assistance is necessary to
advance project feasibility or public benefit. A grant awarded under this
section shall not exceed ten percent of total project costs or five
hundred thousand dollars per project. The total amount of grants awarded
statewide shall not exceed twenty million dollars per fiscal year.
(2) Grant funds may be used only for predevelopment and feasibility
costs, downpayment assistance or credit enhancement, workforce
development and job training, and community engagement and public
consultation activities. Grant funds shall supplement but not replace
private capital mobilized through the tax credit.
Sec. 7. Any tax-credit-supported contribution under the Disinvested
Community Development Incentive Tax Credit Act shall be made to a
qualifying organization. A qualifying organization that receives such a
contribution shall maintain such funds in segregated accounts dedicated
to purposes authorized under the Disinvested Community Development
Incentive Tax Credit Act, shall deploy the funds only for department-
approved projects or activities, and shall comply with the reporting,
audit, and compliance requirements established by the department.
Sec. 8. The department shall electronically submit an annual report
to the Clerk of the Legislature detailing the total amount of tax credits
issued, the total private capital mobilized, the total grant funds
awarded, the number and location of projects supported, the number of
eligible developers assisted, and the number of jobs created or retained.
The department shall also forward the annual report to the Commission on
African American Affairs, the Commission on Asian American Affairs, the
-5-

LB1156 LB1156
2026 2026
Commission on Indian Affairs, or the Commission on Latino-Americans, as
appropriate.
Sec. 9. The department may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of the Disinvested
Community Development Incentive Tax Credit Act.
Sec. 10. This act becomes operative for taxable years beginning or
deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2026, under the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended.
-6-